Wyoming, session 2025, SF0156.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-13-307 by creating a new
subsection (c), 21-13-504 and 21-15-109(f) are amended to
read:

21-13-307. Eligibility to share in distribution of
money from foundation account; mandatory financial
SF0156

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0742
reporting; prohibition of spending foundation program funds
on capital construction.

(c) In no event shall any school district transfer or
expend any funds generated by the foundation program,
defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(v), including but not
limited to local revenues collected under W.S. 21-13-310
and amounts paid to the school district for the purpose of
funding operational expenses under this chapter, for major
building and facility repair or replacement, defined under
W.S. 21-15-109(a)(iii), or for a project, defined under
W.S. 21-15-111(a)(iv), for any educational building, office
building, portable building, teacherage or warehouse
building, defined under W.S. 21-15-109(a).

21-13-504. Special reserve fund.

(a) Except as prohibited under subsection (b) of this
section, the board of trustees of each Wyoming school
district may create a special reserve fund of a specified
amount, for the purpose of purchasing or replacing
specified equipment or a depreciation reserve for equipment
and school building repair. The board may annually include
SF0156

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0742
in its budget for the ensuing fiscal year, the amount so
designated, as a special fund, expendable only for the
purposes stated and segregated as such, from general and
other special school funds, disbursements therefrom to be
made from time to time by the school clerk's warrants drawn
against said special fund, as duly ordered by said board;
provided, that said amount so specially budgeted for any
fiscal year shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total
amount budgeted for the same year; and further provided,
that any difference in the amount so specially budgeted for
any such year and the amount expended from said fund during
such year, may be retained in and carried over as a part of
the special reserve fund.

(b) In no event shall any funds generated by the
foundation program, defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(v),
that are transferred to a special reserve fund be expended
by the board of trustees of a school district for major
building and facility repair or replacement, defined under
W.S. 21-15-109(a)(iii), or for a project, defined under
W.S. 21-15-111(a)(iv), for any educational building, office
building, portable building, teacherage or warehouse
building, defined under W.S. 21-15-109(a).
SF0156

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0742

21-15-109. Major building and facility repair and
replacement payments; computation; square footage
allowance; use of payment funds; accounting and reporting
requirements.

(f) Notwithstanding subsection (e) of this section, a
district may expend up to ten percent (10%) of the amount
distributed during any school year under subsection (b) of
this section for major building and facility repair and
replacement needs of the district which are not specified
in the district's facility plan, including excluding
expenditures for maintenance of district enhancements. In
no event shall funds distributed under this section be
expended by districts on maintenance of district
enhancements. Expenditures shall be made under this
subsection only after the district's building and facility
repair and replacement needs specified in its facility plan
have been addressed in accordance with subsection (e) of
this section and the department has approved the district's
proposed expenditures under this subsection. Amounts not
expended for purposes of this subsection during any school
year may be accumulated by a district and earmarked within
SF0156

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0742
the separate account established under subsection (e) of
this section for expenditure under this subsection in
subsequent school years, provided the unexpended amount
during any school year to be accumulated does not exceed
ten percent (10%) of the amount distributed to the district
under subsection (b) of this section for that school year.
Each district shall include expenditures under this
subsection and any amounts accumulated from year-to-year
under this subsection within the annual report required
under subsection (e) of this section. Nothing in this
subsection shall prohibit or limit the application of
subparagraph (c)(i)(D) of this section in computing a
district's building and facility gross square footage for
purposes of determining payment amounts under this section.
If any school district exceeds expenditure limitations
prescribed by this subsection or fails to comply with
expenditure levels for facility adequacy needs identified
within its facility plan, the payments for that district in
the immediately succeeding year shall be reduced by the
excess expenditure amount including any excess expenditure
of amounts accumulated under this subsection.

SF0156

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0742
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0156